Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3291.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Proposition to be submitted to the people.
At the general election to be held on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November
2026, there shall be submitted to the people ("people") of the State of Rhode Island ("state"), for
their approval or rejection, the following proposition:
"Shall the action of the general assembly, by an act passed at the 2026 legislative session,
authorizing the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, and temporary notes of the State of Rhode
Island for the capital project and in the amount of thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000) with
respect to the projects relating to the Boys and Girls Clubs of Rhode Island listed below be
approved, and the issuance of bonds, refunding bonds, and temporary notes authorized in
accordance with the provisions of said act?"
Approval of this question will allow the State of Rhode Island to issue general obligation
bonds, refunding bonds, and/or temporary notes in an amount not to exceed thirty-six million
dollars ($36,000,000).
These projects funded with the bond proceeds will provide for critical improvement and
renovations for Boys and Girls Clubs located throughout the State of Rhode Island, including the
following:
(1) Improvements to the Boys & Girls Clubs of Newport County's summer camp facility,
Camp Grosvenor, such as upgrades to the camp bathhouse, renovation of the boat house and

waterfront beach area, renovation of the mess hall and kitchen, renovation of the main study lodge,
and upgrade of the drinking water system;
(2) Significant renovations to both the exterior and interior of the Cumberland-Lincoln
Clubhouse, addressing critical infrastructure, safety upgrades, energy efficiency improvements,
and enhanced spaces for youth programming and community use;
(3) Improvements to facilities in East Providence, including renovations at Camp Crosby
and Williams Avenue Clubhouse, including major infrastructure and facility upgrades to enhance
safety, accessibility, and program offerings at the camp, and improvements to the Sacred Heart
School, which the Club is negotiating to repurpose as a Boys & Girls Club;
(4) Initiating a transformative capital project at the Boys and Girls Club of Pawtucket to
enhance a 20 acre outdoor campus and revitalize the surrounding riverfront, as well as
comprehensive upgrades to all athletic fields and recreation spaces, adding a state-of-the-art turf
field, and modernizing courts and play areas- including the creation of an inclusive playground for
all youth members;
(5) Significant renovations and upgrades at several facilities across the City of Providence,
including the development of a new workforce center serving 500 teens annually in healthcare,
trades, and technology fields, alongside expanded childcare, upgraded pool and gym areas, and
new arts, dance, and teen spaces at the Wanskuck Club and other significant improvements to the
facilities at the Fox Point and Southside Clubs; and
(6) The creation of the Neurodivergent Boys & Girls Club of Warwick, which will be an
inclusive addition to the Clubs existing location, designed to serve children with autism, ADHD,
dyslexia, and other neurodiverse needs.
SECTION 2. Ballot labels and applicability of general election laws.
The secretary of state shall prepare and deliver to the state board of elections ballot labels
for the project provided for in section 1 hereof with the designations "approve" or "reject" provided
next to the description of the project to enable voters to approve or reject the proposition. The
general election laws, so far as consistent herewith, shall apply to this proposition.
SECTION 3. Approval of project by people.
If a majority of the people voting on the proposition in section 1 hereof shall vote to
approve the project stated therein, said project shall be deemed to be approved by the people. The
authority to issue bonds, refunding bonds and/or temporary notes of the state shall be limited to the
aggregate amount for the project as set forth in the proposition, which has been approved by the
people.
SECTION 4. Bonds for capital development program.
LC006379 - Page 2 of 8

The general treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the
governor, and in accordance with the provisions of this act to issue capital development bonds in
serial form, in the name of and on behalf of the State of Rhode Island, in amounts as may be
specified by the governor in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the total amount for the
project approved by the people and designated as ”capital development loan of 2026 bonds.”
Provided, however, that the aggregate principal amount of such capital development bonds and of
any temporary notes outstanding at any one time issued in anticipation thereof pursuant to section
7 hereof shall not exceed the total amount for the project approved by the people. All provisions in
this act relating to “bonds” shall also be deemed to apply to “refunding bonds.”
Capital development bonds issued under this act shall be in denominations of one thousand
dollars ($1,000) each, or multiples thereof, and shall be payable in any coin or currency of the
United States which at the time of payment shall be legal tender for public and private debts. These
capital development bonds shall bear such date or dates, mature at specified time or times, but not
mature beyond the end of the twentieth state fiscal year following the fiscal year in which they are
issued; bear interest payable semi-annually at a specified rate or different or varying rates; be
payable at a designated time or times at a specified place or places; be subject to express terms of
redemption or recall, with or without premium; be in a form, with or without interest coupons
attached; carry such registration, conversion, reconversion, transfer, debt retirement, acceleration
and other provisions as may be fixed by the general treasurer, with the approval by the governor,
upon each issue of such capital development bonds at the time of each issue. Whenever the
governor shall approve the issuance of such capital development bonds, the governor's approval
shall be certified to the secretary of state; the bonds shall be signed by the general treasurer and
countersigned by the secretary of state and shall bear the seal of the state. The signature approval
of the governor shall be endorsed on each bond.
SECTION 5. Refunding bonds for 2026 capital development program.
The general treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the
governor, and in accordance with the provisions of this act, to issue bonds to refund the 2026 capital
development program bonds, in the name of and on behalf of the state, in amounts as may be
specified by the governor in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed the total amount approved
by the people, to be designated as “capital development program loan of 2026 refunding bonds”
(hereinafter “refunding bonds”). The general treasurer with the approval of the governor shall fix
the terms and form of any refunding bonds issued under this act in the same manner as the capital
development bonds issued under this act, except that the refunding bonds may not mature more
than twenty (20) years from the date of original issue of the capital development bonds being
LC006379 - Page 3 of 8

refunded.
The proceeds of the refunding bonds, exclusive of any premium and accrual interest and
net the underwriters' cost, and cost of bond insurance, shall, upon their receipt, be paid by the
general treasurer immediately to the paying agent for the capital development bonds which are to
be called and prepaid. The paying agent shall hold the refunding bond proceeds in trust until they
are applied to prepay the capital development bonds. While such proceeds are held in trust, the
proceeds may be invested for the benefit of the state in obligations of the United States of America
or the State of Rhode Island.
If the general treasurer shall deposit with the paying agent for the capital development
bonds the proceeds of the refunding bonds, or proceeds from other sources, amounts that, when
invested in obligations of the United States or the State of Rhode Island, are sufficient to pay all
principal, interest, and premium, if any, on the capital development bonds until these bonds are
called for prepayment, then such capital development bonds shall not be considered debts of the
State of Rhode Island for any purpose starting from the date of deposit of such monies with the
paying agent. The refunding bonds shall continue to be a debt of the state until paid. The term
“bond” shall include “note,” and the term “refunding bonds” shall include “refunding notes” when
used in this act.
SECTION 6. Proceeds of capital development program.
The general treasurer is directed to deposit the proceeds from the sale of capital
development bonds issued under this act, exclusive of premiums and accrued interest and net the
underwriters’ cost, and cost of bond insurance, in one or more of the depositories in which the funds
of the state may be lawfully kept in special accounts (hereinafter cumulatively referred to as “such
capital development bond fund”) appropriately designated for the project set forth in section 1
hereof which shall have been approved by the people to be used for the purpose of paying the cost
of the project so approved. All monies in the capital development bond fund shall be expended for
the purposes specified in the proposition provided for in section 1 hereof under the direction and
supervision of the director of administration (hereinafter referred to as “director”). The director, or
designee shall be vested with all power and authority necessary or incidental to the purposes of this
act including, but not limited to, the following authority:
(1) To acquire land or other real property or any interest, estate or right therein as may be
necessary or advantageous to accomplish the purposes of this act;
(2) To direct payment for the preparation of any reports, plans and specifications, and
relocation expenses and other costs such as for furnishings, equipment designing, inspecting and
engineering, required in connection with the implementation of the project set forth in section 1
LC006379 - Page 4 of 8

hereof;
(3) To direct payment for the costs of construction, rehabilitation, enlargement, provision
of service utilities, and razing of facilities, and other improvements to land in connection with the
implementation of the project set forth in section 1 hereof; and
(4) To direct payment for the cost of equipment, supplies, devices, materials and labor for
repair, renovation or conversion of systems and structures as necessary for the 2026 capital
development program bonds or notes hereunder from the proceeds thereof. No funds shall be
expended in excess of the amount of the capital development bond fund designated for the project
authorized in section 1 hereof. With respect to the bonds and temporary notes described in section
1, the proceeds shall be used for the following purpose:
Question 1, relating to bonds in an amount not to exceed thirty-six million dollars
($36,000,000) to provide funding for critical improvement and renovations for Boys and Girls
Clubs located throughout the State of Rhode Island.
SECTION 7. Sale of bonds and notes.
Any bonds or notes issued under the authority of this act shall be sold at not less than the
principal amount thereof, in such mode and on such terms and conditions as the general treasurer,
with the approval of the governor, shall deem to be in the best interests of the state.
Any premiums and accrued interest, net of the cost of bond insurance and underwriter’s
discount, which may be received on the sale of the capital development bonds or notes shall become
part of the Rhode Island capital plan fund of the state, unless directed by federal law or regulation
to be used for some other purpose.
In the event that the amount received from the sale of the capital development bonds or
notes exceeds the amount necessary for the purposes stated in section 6 hereof, the surplus may be
used to the extent possible to retire the bonds as the same may become due, to redeem them in
accordance with the terms thereof or otherwise to purchase them as the general treasurer, with the
approval of the governor, shall deem to be in the best interests of the state.
Any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this act and coupons on any capital
development bonds, if properly executed by the manual or electronic signatures of officers of the
state in office on the date of execution, shall be valid and binding according to their tenor,
notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all such officers shall
for any reason have ceased to hold office.
SECTION 8. Bonds and notes to be tax exempt and general obligations of the state.
All bonds and notes issued under the authority of this act shall be exempt from taxation in
the state and shall be general obligations of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state is
LC006379 - Page 5 of 8

hereby pledged for the due payment of the principal and interest on each of such bonds and notes
as the same shall become due.
SECTION 9. Investment of monies in fund.
All monies in the capital development fund not immediately required for payment pursuant
to the provisions of this act may be invested by the investment commission, as established by
chapter 10 of title 35, entitled "state investment commission," pursuant to the provisions of such
chapter; provided, however, that the securities in which the capital development fund is invested
shall remain a part of the capital development fund until exchanged for other securities; and
provided further, that the income from investments of the capital development fund shall become
a part of the general fund of the state and shall be applied to the payment of debt service charges
of the state, unless directed by federal law or regulation to be used for some other purpose, or to
the extent necessary, to rebate to the United States Treasury any income from investments
(including gains from the disposition of investments) of proceeds of bonds or notes to the extent
deemed necessary to exempt (in whole or in part) the interest paid on such bonds or notes from
federal income taxation.
SECTION 10. Appropriation.
To the extent the debt service on these bonds is not otherwise provided, a sum sufficient to
pay the interest and principal due each year on bonds and notes hereunder is hereby annually
appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated.
SECTION 11. Advances from general fund.
The general treasurer is authorized, with the approval of the director and the governor, in
anticipation of the issue of bonds or notes under the authority of this act, to advance to the capital
development bond fund for the purposes specified in section 6 hereof, any funds of the state not
specifically held for any particular purpose; provided, however, that all advances made to the
capital development bond fund shall be returned to the general fund from the capital development
bond fund forthwith upon the receipt by the capital development fund of proceeds resulting from
the issue of bonds or notes to the extent of such advances.
SECTION 12. Federal assistance and private funds.
In carrying out this act, the director, or designee, is authorized on behalf of the state, with
the approval of the governor, to apply for and accept any federal assistance which may become
available for the purpose of this act, whether in the form of loan or grant or otherwise, to accept the
provision of any federal legislation therefor, to enter into, act and carry out contracts in connection
therewith, to act as agent for the federal government in connection therewith, or to designate a
subordinate so to act. Where federal assistance is made available, the project shall be carried out in
LC006379 - Page 6 of 8

accordance with applicable federal law, the rules and regulations thereunder and the contract or
contracts providing for federal assistance, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of state law.
Subject to the foregoing, any federal funds received for the purposes of this act shall be
deposited in the capital development bond fund and expended as a part thereof. The director, or
designee may also utilize any private funds that may be made available for the purposes of this act.
SECTION 13. Sections 1, 2, 3, 11, 12, and 13 of this act shall take effect upon passage.
The remaining sections of this act shall take effect when and if the state board of elections shall
certify to the secretary of state that a majority of the qualified electors voting on the proposition
contained in section 1 hereof have indicated their approval of the project thereunder.

========
LC006379
========
LC006379 - Page 7 of 8